Arkansas, session 2025, HB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 7, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-7-739. Annuity payments owed to beneficiary of a special needs
trust.
(a) A member who designates a person or the parent or legal guardian
of a person who is designated as a beneficiary of an annuity or benefit under
§ 24-7-706, § 24-7-709, § 24-7-711, or § 24-7-720 may elect to have the
annuity or benefit paid to a special needs trust that is established for the
benefit of the person under 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on
January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on January 1,
2025.
*LJH120*
03-12-2025 14:05:59 LJH120

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 S3/12/25 HB1347
(b) The parent or legal guardian of a person who is eligible to
receive an annuity under § 24-7-710 may elect to have the annuity paid to a
special needs trust that is established for the benefit of the person under
42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. §
1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(c)(1) The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall pay an annuity or
benefit directly to a person if at the time that the person is entitled to
receive an annuity or a benefit payment under § 24-7-706, § 24-7-709, § 24-7-
710, § 24-7-711, or § 24-7-720:
(A) A special needs trust has not been established for the
benefit of the person under 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on
January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on January 1,
2025; or
(B) A special needs trust established for the person under
42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. §
1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on January 1, 2025, cannot be identified by the
system or ceases to exist.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not prohibit the
system from paying an annuity or benefit to a special needs trust that is
later established for the person under 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it
existed on January 1, 2025, or 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on
January 1, 2025, if the special needs trust can be identified by the system
and an election is made under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the system
to:
(1) Establish a trust;
(2) Act as trustee; or
(3) Verify the compliance of a trust with Arkansas law or
federal law.
(e) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System
may promulgate rules to administer this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after July 1,
2026.

03-12-2025 14:05:59 LJH120

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 S3/12/25 HB1347
/s/Warren



































03-12-2025 14:05:59 LJH120